test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-hella_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - hellá: # á-stems
    hellá+N+Sg+Nom: hellá
    hellá+N+Sg+Gen: helá
    hellá+N+Sg+Ill: heelán
    hellá+N+Sg+Loc: helláást
    hellá+N+Sg+Com: helláin
    hellá+N+Sg+Abe: heláttáá
    hellá+N+Ess: hellán
    hellá+N+Par: hellád
    hellá+N+Pl+Nom: heláh
    hellá+N+Pl+Gen: helái
    hellá+N+Pl+Acc: helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Ill: helláid
    hellá+N+Pl+Loc: heláin
    hellá+N+Pl+Com: heláiguin
    hellá+N+Pl+Abe: heláittáá
